Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 1 General Provisions
54-7-109. Duties of chief administrative officer.

The chief administrative officer shall be the head of the highway department and shall have general control over the location, relocation, construction, reconstruction, repair and maintenance of the county road systems of the county, including roads designated as county roads under § 13-3-406 and including bridges and ferries, but not including roads and bridges under the supervision of the department of transportation or a municipality.

It is the duty of the chief administrative officer to employ qualified administrative personnel as required to handle all administrative functions, including maintenance of financial records, inventory of equipment, supplies, and materials, preservation of maintenance records, maintenance of the official county road list, and all other functions necessary for the operation of the highway department.

The chief administrative officer is authorized to determine the total number of employees of the highway department, to determine personnel policies, hours of work, to establish job classifications, and to establish policies and wages within the classifications. The compensation established by the chief administrative officer should be in keeping with the compensation paid for similar services in the county and surrounding area.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 8; 1977, ch. 369, §§ 1, 2; modified; T.C.A., § 54-1009; Acts 1981, ch. 180, §§ 1, 3; impl. am. Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 4.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, rewrote (a) and (b), which read: “(a) The chief administrative officer, except in those counties with elected road commissioners or county councils wherein the general control and authority provided by this subsection (a) remains as provided by private or general act, shall be the head of the county highway department and shall have general control over the location, relocation, construction, reconstruction, repair and maintenance of the county road systems of the county, including roads designated as county roads under § 13-3-406, and including bridges and ferries, but not including roads and bridges under the supervision of the department of transportation; provided, that the county road system shall not include roads designated as county roads under § 13-3-406 in counties having a population, according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, of:not less than nor more than 12,550 12,60013,600 13,70014,800 14,90060,250 60,350“(b) It is the duty of the chief administrative officer to employ a qualified secretary and other office personnel as required to handle all correspondence, maintain accurate records of receipts and expenditures, equipment, supplies, materials, maintenance performed, and other items necessary for the operation of the county highway department.”; and, in (c), deleted “county” preceding “highway department” in the first sentence, and substituted “the compensation paid” for “that paid” in the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

Attorney General Opinions. Jurisdiction and Maintenance of County Roads in State Forests. OAG 15-50, 2015 Tenn. AG LEXIS 48 (6/8/15).

54-7-110. Employment of legal counsel.

The chief administrative officer shall be empowered to employ legal counsel or to solicit the use of legal counsel retained by the county to prosecute or defend litigation caused by or necessary to the operation of the county highway department.

[Deleted by 2012 amendment.]

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 9; T.C.A., § 54-1010; Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 5.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted (b) which read: “In those counties with road commissioners or county councils, the general control and authority provided by this section for the chief administrative officer shall remain as provided by private or general act.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

54-7-111. Annual work program — Priorities for proposed work.

The chief administrative officer shall prepare and submit to the county legislative body and to the department of transportation an annual work program to be financed under the state-aid highway system program.

The priorities for proposed work contained in the annual work program shall be established, taking into consideration the degree of deficiencies in the structural condition, capacity and safety of existing roadway, traffic volume and desirable level of service necessary for schools, religious institutions, industry, recreational facilities and other major uses.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 10; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 7, 36; T.C.A., § 54-1011; Acts 1980, ch. 530, § 1; 1983, ch. 320, § 4; 2012, ch. 689, § 6.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, in (a), substituted “shall prepare” for “shall have prepared” and deleted “or other governing body” following “county legislative body”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

54-7-112. Safeguarding and inventory of machinery and equipment — Enforcement.

The chief administrative officer has supervision and control over and is responsible for all the machinery, equipment, tools, supplies and materials owned or used by the county in the construction, reconstruction, repair and maintenance of the county roads and bridges. The chief administrative officer shall make or cause to be made a complete inventory of all machinery, equipment, tools, supplies, and materials, and file copies of the complete inventory with the county governing body, and the chief executive officer of the county within sixty (60) days after taking office, and thereafter a revised current inventory shall be submitted effective July 1 of each year. The revised inventory shall be submitted by September 1 of each year.

All machinery, equipment and tools shall be plainly marked as the property of the county road department and each item shall be numbered and the number entered on the inventory filed by the chief administrative officer. It is the duty of the chief executive officer of the county to examine the inventories for compliance with this subsection (b), and upon the chief executive officer's determination that the inventory does not comply with the requirements of this chapter, the chief executive officer shall cause to be withheld from the chief administrative officer any funds due the chief administrative officer until the chief administrative officer complies with this subsection (b).

The inventory filed by the chief administrative officer shall be maintained and made available to the comptroller of the treasury for audit purposes.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 11; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 16, 36; T.C.A., § 54-1012; Acts 1980, ch. 473, § 1; 1995, ch. 179, §§ 16, 17.

Attorney General Opinions. County highway superintendent's duties, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).

The responsibility of county highway departments to maintain and repair bridges in the county pertains to public bridges or to those that any and all members of the public have an absolute right to use, as distinguished from a permissive privilege as in a private passageway, OAG 01-080 (5/17/01).

54-7-113. Receipt and disbursement of funds — Public advertisement and competitive bidding — Chart of accounts.

All funds received by any person for the county for road or highway purposes shall be promptly deposited with the county trustee and shall be expended only upon a disbursement warrant drawn on the trustee in accordance with law.

Expenditures of funds for the operation of the county road department shall be made within the limits of the approved budget and the appropriations made for the department, in accordance with law.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3), all purchases by or for a county road department or by a chief administrative officer shall be by public advertisement and competitive bid, except as follows:

Purchases costing less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000); provided, that this exemption shall not apply to purchases of like items that individually cost less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000), but that are customarily purchased in lots of two (2) or more, if the total purchase price of the items would exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) during any fiscal year;

Repair of heavy road building machinery or other heavy machinery for which limited repair facilities are available;

Purchases of any supplies, materials, or equipment for immediate delivery in actual emergencies arising from unforeseen causes, including delays by contractors, delays in transportation, and unanticipated volume of work; but emergencies shall not include conditions arising from neglect or indifference in anticipating normal needs. A report of emergency purchases shall be kept, specifying each purchase, the amount paid, the items purchased, from whom the items were purchased, and the nature of the emergency; and

All purchases costing less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) by or for a county road department or by a chief administrative officer may be made in the open market without newspaper notice, but shall, wherever possible, be based on at least three (3) competitive bids.

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(3), all leases or lease-purchase arrangements requiring payments of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or more, or that are made or are automatically extendable, for periods of more than ninety (90) days, shall be entered into only after public advertisement and competitive bidding.

This subsection (c) does not have the effect of repealing existing statutes, including private acts, that establish purchasing provisions for a county road department; but no county road department shall be required to publicly advertise and competitively bid purchases of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or less even if the bids are now required by public or private act.

A chart of accounts shall be kept by the chief administrative officer in conformity with a uniform chart of accounts developed and prescribed by the comptroller of the treasury in accordance with §§ 5-8-501 — 5-8-503.

Acts 1974, ch. 738, § 12; T.C.A., § 54-1013; Acts 1980, ch. 473, § 2; 1980, ch. 726, § 1; 1983, ch. 295, § 1; 1995, ch. 179, §§ 6-8; 2005, ch. 114, § 1; 2012, ch. 689, § 7.

Amendments. The 2012 amendment, effective January 1, 2013, deleted the former last sentence of (c) which read: “This subsection (c) shall apply to all counties of the state except counties of population of two hundred thousand (200,000) or more according to the 1970 federal census, whether or not excluded from this chapter.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 11. January 1, 2013.

54-7-114. [Repealed.]

Acts 1985, ch. 358, § 1; repealed by Acts 2012, ch. 689, § 8, effective January 1, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Section 54-7-114 concerned road maintenance agreements with adjoining counties.

54-7-115. Authorization to receive materials, property, services, funds or supplies for benefit of county highway department — Road repairs by private persons and entities.

A county highway department is authorized to receive materials, property, services, funds or supplies for the benefit of the county highway department, which materials, property, services, funds or supplies shall be used or disbursed in good faith in accordance with the terms or conditions of the donation or reimbursement. Funds so received shall be paid into the office of the county trustee, credited to the county highway fund and disbursed according to law as other funds of the county highway department.

The county highway department may adopt a policy to authorize private persons or entities to repair county roads to bring a road damaged by that person or entity up to the condition or standard of the road previous to the damage caused by the private person or entity.

Acts 1990, ch. 765, § 1.

54-7-116. Authorization to sign contracts.

There is created a presumption of law that the chief administrative officer of each county highway department is authorized to sign agreements with the department of transportation on behalf of the county. Once an agreement is executed by the chief administrative officer of the county highway department for any county of the state, the agreement shall be fully binding upon the applicable county. The presumption of law may only be overcome by the provision of notice by the county legislative body that the chief administrative officer of the county highway department does not have the authority to execute these agreements on behalf of the county. The receipt of the notice shall be acknowledged by the department in order to overcome the presumption of law set forth in this section.

Acts 1995, ch. 263, § 1.

Attorney General Opinions. County highway superintendent's duties, OAG 99-005 (1/25/99).

Counties are authorized to enter into contracts with the state for the maintenance of roads inside state parks or state forests as long as the agreement provides that the county road department is to be reimbursed for the costs of such project, OAG 00-100 (5/24/00).